Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.070

Payment of principal and interest—Additional means for raising money authorized.

The legislature may provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in RCW 28A.527.010, and *RCW 28A.527.010 shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the payment.

[ 2008 c 179 s 208.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 28A.527.010 appears to be erroneous. Reference to RCW 28A.527.040 was apparently intended.